Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1659
Master key list; juror qualification form; review; names stricken.

(1) If the jury commissioner finds, after reviewing a completed juror qualification form, that a potential juror does not possess the qualifications of a juror as set forth in section 25-1650 or is excluded by the terms of section 25-1650, the jury commissioner shall strike such potential juror's name from the master key list and make a record of each name stricken, which record shall be kept in the jury commissioner's office subject to inspection by the court and attorneys of record in cases triable to a jury pending before the court, under such rules as the court may prescribe.

(2) Any person entitled to access to the list of names stricken may make a request to the judge of the district court, in accordance with section 25-1673, for an explanation of the reasons a name has been stricken. If the judge is satisfied that such request is made in good faith and in accordance with section 25-1673, the judge shall direct the jury commissioner to appear before the judge at chambers and, in the presence of the requesting person, state his or her reasons for striking such name.

Laws 1915, c. 248, § 5, p. 570;

C.S.1922, § 9099;

C.S.1929, § 20-1629;

Laws 1939, c. 18, § 14, p. 106;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 20-1629;

R.S.1943, § 25-1629;

Laws 1953, c. 7, § 1, p. 221;

Laws 1953, c. 72, § 9, p. 229;

Laws 1955, c. 9, § 4, p. 266;

Laws 1977, LB 283, § 2;

Laws 1979, LB 234, § 9;

Laws 1985, LB 113, § 3;

R.S.1943, (2016), § 25-1629;

Laws 2020, LB387, § 16.

The key-number system for the selection of jurors from voter registration lists is constitutionally valid. State v. Addison, 198 Neb. 442, 253 N.W.2d 165 (1977).

In selection of grand jury, names can be drawn from more than one panel. State v. Abboud, 181 Neb. 84, 147 N.W.2d 152 (1966).

Until jury list created by drawing of key number is exhausted, no new jury list can be made. Maher v. State, 144 Neb. 463, 13 N.W.2d 641 (1944).